Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6618YH (1) 91 sb/js H.F. 2313 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 455B.200 Coal ash pollution. 1 1. It is the intent of the general assembly to protect 2 communities, drinking water, groundwater, and the air from 3 the toxic pollutants in coal ash. Coal ash contains mercury, 4 arsenic, cadmium, and other contaminants associated with 5 cancer, kidney and liver damage, and other serious health 6 effects. Water pollution from the toxic metals in coal ash 7 is avoidable with current technology. It is the intent of 8 the general assembly to prevent electric power generating 9 facilities fueled by coal from discharging toxic pollutants 10 into the water to the best extent technology allows. 11 2. An electric power generating facility fueled by coal 12 or a coal ash landfill shall not discharge toxic pollutants 13 from flue gas desulfurization wastewater, bottom ash transport 14 water, or combustion residual leachate into water sources. 15 3. An electric power generating facility fueled by coal or 16 a coal ash landfill in operation before July 1, 2026, shall 17 comply with subsection 2 as soon as possible, but not later 18 than December 31, 2029. All other electric power generating 19 facilities fueled by coal or coal ash landfills shall comply 20 with subsection 2 before commencing operation. 21 4. The department shall promulgate rules necessary to 22 implement this section. 23